Missouri, session 2026, HB2898.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 140.010, 140.190, 140.250, 140.420, 140.980, 140.981, 140.982,
140.983, 140.984, 140.985, 140.986, 140.987, 140.988, 140.991, 140.994, 140.995,
140.1000, 140.1009, 140.1012, 141.220, 141.230, 141.250, 141.270, 141.290, 141.300,
141.320, 141.330, 141.360, 141.410, 141.440, 141.500, 141.520, 141.535, 141.540, 141.550,
141.560, 141.570, 141.580, 141.610, 141.620, 141.680, 141.700, 141.819, 141.980, 141.984,
141.1009, 141.1020, and 249.255, RSMo, are repealed and forty-eight new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 140.010, 140.190, 140.250, 140.420, 140.980,
140.981, 140.982, 140.983, 140.984, 140.985, 140.986, 140.987, 140.988, 140.991, 140.994,
140.995, 140.1000, 140.1009, 140.1012, 141.220, 141.230, 141.250, 141.270, 141.290,
141.300, 141.320, 141.330, 141.360, 141.410, 141.440, 141.500, 141.520, 141.535, 141.540,
141.550, 141.560, 141.570, 141.580, 141.610, 141.620, 141.680, 141.700, 141.819, 141.980,
141.984, 141.1009, 141.1020, and 249.255, to read as follows:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2898 2
140.010. 1. All real estate upon which the taxes remain unpaid on the first day of
January, annually, are delinquent, and the county collector shall enforce the lien of the state
thereon, as required by this chapter. Any failure to properly return the delinquent list, as
required by this chapter, in no way affects the validity of the assessment and levy of taxes, nor
of the foreclosure and sale by which the collection of the taxes is enforced, nor in any manner
affects the lien of the state on the delinquent real estate for the taxes unpaid thereon.
2. Alternatively, any county may, by adoption of a resolution or order of the county
commission of such county, elect to operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
141.810 for any parcel [for which there is an unpaid tax bill for a period of at least two years
after the date on which it became delinquent]. Any county electing to operate as such shall be
called a "partial opt-in county". No county eligible to establish a land bank agency under
subsection 1 of section 140.981 shall elect to operate as a partial opt-in county unless the
county first elects to establish a land bank agency as provided in subsection 1 of section
140.981. In accordance with section 141.290, after the adoption of such resolution or order
by a county commission, the collector of the county shall decide which tax delinquent parcels
shall proceed according to the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810. Such parcels shall
be exempt from the provisions of sections 140.030 to 140.722. The collector shall remove
such parcels from any list of parcels advertised for first, second, third, or post-third sales.
140.190. 1. On the day mentioned in the notice, the county collector shall commence
the sale of such lands, and shall continue the same from day to day until each parcel assessed
or belonging to each person assessed shall be sold as will pay the taxes, interest, and charges
thereon, or chargeable to such person in said county.
2. (1) The person or land bank agency offering at said sale to pay the required sum
for a tract shall be considered the purchaser of such land; provided, no sale shall be made to
any person or designated agent who:
(a) Is currently delinquent on any tax payments on any property, other than a
delinquency on the property being offered for sale, and who does not sign an affidavit stating
such at the time of sale. Failure to sign such affidavit as well as signing a false affidavit may
invalidate such sale;
(b) Is a member of the governing body of a land bank agency;
(c) Is an employee of a land bank agency;
(d) Is an elected or appointed official of the governing body, or an employee of such
official, of the political subdivision in which a land bank agency is located; or
(e) Is related within the second degree of consanguinity to a person described in
paragraphs (b) to (d) of this subdivision.
(2) No bid shall be received from any person not a resident of the state of Missouri or
a foreign corporation or entity all deemed nonresidents. A nonresident shall file with said

HB 2898 3
collector an agreement in writing consenting to the jurisdiction of the circuit court of the
county in which such sale shall be made, and also filing with such collector an appointment of
some citizen of said county as agent of said nonresident, and consenting that service of
process on such agent shall give such court jurisdiction to try and determine any suit growing
out of or connected with such sale for taxes. After the delinquent auction sale, any certificate
of purchase shall be issued to the agent. After meeting the requirements of section 140.405,
the property shall be conveyed to the agent on behalf of the nonresident, and the agent shall
thereafter convey the property to the nonresident. A collector may preclude a prospective
bidder from participating in a sale for failure to comply with any of the provisions of this
section.
3. All such written consents to jurisdiction and selective appointments shall be
preserved by the county collector and shall be binding upon any person or corporation
claiming under the person consenting to jurisdiction and making the appointment herein
referred to; provided further, that in the event of the death, disability or refusal to act of the
person appointed as agent of said nonresident the county clerk shall become the appointee as
agent of said nonresident.
4. No person residing in any home rule city with more than seventy-one thousand but
fewer than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants shall be eligible to offer to purchase lands under
this section unless such person has, no later than ten days before the sale date, demonstrated
to the satisfaction of the official charged by law with conducting the sale that the person is not
the owner of any parcel of real property that has two or more violations of the municipality's
building or housing codes. A prospective bidder may make such a demonstration by
presenting statements from the appropriate collection and code enforcement officials of the
municipality. This subsection shall not apply to any taxing authority or land bank agency, and
entities shall be eligible to bid at any sale conducted under this section without making such a
demonstration.
140.250. 1. Whenever any lands have been or shall hereafter be offered for sale for
delinquent taxes, interest, penalty, and costs by the collector of the proper county for any two
successive years and no person shall have bid therefor a sum equal to the delinquent taxes
thereon, interest, penalty and costs provided by law, then such county collector shall at the
next regular tax sale of lands for delinquent taxes sell same to the highest bidder, except the
highest bid shall not be less than the sum equal to the delinquent taxes, interest, penalties, and
costs, and there shall be a ninety-day period of redemption from such sales as specified in
section 140.405.
2. A certificate of purchase shall be issued as to such sales, and the purchaser at such
sales shall be entitled to the issuance and delivery of a collector's deed upon completion of
title search action as specified in section 140.405.

HB 2898 4
3. If any lands or lots are not sold at such third offering, then the collector shall
advertise or offer such lands or lots for sale once every thirty days.
4. A purchaser at any sale subsequent to the third offering of any land or lots, whether
by the collector or a trustee as provided in section 140.260, shall be entitled to the immediate
issuance and delivery of a collector's deed and there shall be no period of redemption from
such post-third year sales; provided, however, before any purchaser at a sale to which this
section is applicable shall be entitled to a collector's deed it shall be the duty of the collector
to demand, and the purchaser to pay, in addition to the purchaser's bid, all taxes due and
unpaid on such lands or lots that become due and payable on such lands or lots subsequent to
the date of the taxes included in such advertisement and sale. The collector's deed or trustee's
deed shall have priority over all other liens or encumbrances on the property sold except for
real property taxes.
5. A purchaser at any sale subsequent to the third offering of any land or lots, whether
by the collector or a trustee as provided in section 140.260, may elect to proceed under
subsection 1 of this section and subsection 6 of section 140.405 by giving notice to the
collector prior to the issuance of a collector's deed.
6. In the event the real purchaser at any sale to which this section is applicable shall
be the owner of the lands or lots purchased, or shall be obligated to pay the taxes for the
nonpayment of which such lands or lots were sold, then no collector's deed shall be issued to
such purchaser, or to anyone acting for or on behalf of such purchaser, without payment to the
collector of such additional amount as will discharge in full all delinquent taxes, penalty,
interest and costs.
140.420. If no person shall redeem the lands sold for taxes prior to the expiration of
the right to redeem, at the expiration thereof, and on production of the certificate of purchase
and upon proof satisfactory to the collector that a purchaser or the purchaser's heirs,
successors, or assigns are authorized to acquire the deed:
(1) The collector of the county in which the sale of such lands took place shall
execute to the purchaser or the purchaser's heirs or assigns, in the name of the state, a
conveyance of the real estate so sold, which shall vest in the grantee an absolute estate in fee
simple, subject, however, to all claims thereon for unpaid taxes except such unpaid taxes,
existing at time of the purchase of said lands and the lien for which taxes was inferior to the
lien for taxes for which said tract or lot of land was sold; and
(2) The state of Missouri or any person, taxing authority, tax district, judgment
creditor, or lienholder that had a right, title, interest, claim, or equity of redemption on or to
the lands or that had a lien upon the lands shall be barred and forever foreclosed of such
unclaimed right, title, interest, claim, or equity of redemption in or to the lands and of any lien
upon the lands.

HB 2898 5
140.980. 1. Sections 140.980 to 140.1015 shall be known [and may be cited] as the
"Chapter 140 Land Bank Act".
2. As used in sections 140.980 to 140.1015, the following terms mean:
(1) "Land bank agency", an agency established by a county or municipality under the
authority of section 140.981;
(2) "Land taxes", taxes on real property or real estate, including the taxes both on the
land and the improvements thereon;
(3) "Municipality", any incorporated city, town, or village in this state;
(4) "Political subdivision", any county, city, town, village, school district, library
district, or any other public subdivision or public corporation that has the power to tax;
(5) "Reserve period taxes", land taxes assessed against any parcel of real estate sold
or otherwise disposed of by a land bank agency for the first three tax years following such
sale or disposition;
(6) "Tax bill", real estate taxes and the lien thereof, whether general or special, levied
and assessed by any taxing authority;
(7) "Taxing authority", any governmental, managing, administering, or other lawful
authority, now or hereafter empowered by law to issue tax bills.
140.981. 1. Any county with more than one million inhabitants may establish a land
bank agency for the management, sale, transfer, and other disposition of interests in real estate
owned by such land bank agency. Any such county may establish a land bank agency by
ordinance, resolution, or rule, as applicable. Such ordinance, resolution, or rule shall specify
the name of the land bank agency. No county in which a land bank agency has been
established under the provisions of sections 141.980 to 141.1015 shall elect to establish a land
bank agency under this section.
2. Any municipality with more than one thousand five hundred inhabitants not
located within a county with more than one million inhabitants may establish a land bank
agency for the management, sale, transfer, and other disposition of interests in real estate
owned by such land bank agency. A municipality may establish a land bank agency by
ordinance, resolution, or rule, as applicable.
3. A land bank agency shall not own any interest in real estate located wholly or
partially outside the [city] municipality or county that established the land bank.
4. A land bank agency shall be established for the purpose of returning land,
including land that is in a non-revenue-generating, non-tax-producing status, to use in private
ownership, or for public use.
5. A land bank agency created under the chapter 140 land bank act shall be a public
body corporate and politic and shall have permanent and perpetual duration until terminated
and dissolved in accordance with the provisions of section 140.1012.

HB 2898 6
140.982. 1. If a county establishes a land bank agency under subsection 1 of section
140.981, the members of the first board of directors of a land bank agency shall be appointed
within ninety days after the effective date of the ordinance, resolution, or rule passed
establishing such land bank agency. [If any appointing authority fails to make any
appointment of a board member within the time the first appointments are required, the
appointment shall be made by the county council. The following requirements shall apply to
the board of directors:
(1) The board of directors shall consist of seven members:
(a) Two of whom shall be appointed by the county executive, one of whom shall have
professional expertise relevant to the land bank agency;
(b) One of whom shall be appointed by the member of the county council
representing the district with the highest number of tax delinquent parcels. Such board
member shall maintain a primary residence within such district;
(c) One of whom shall be appointed by the member of the county council
representing the district with the second highest number of tax delinquent parcels. Such
board member shall maintain a primary residence within such district;
(d) One of whom shall be appointed by consensus of the county executive and the
president of the municipal league of the county; and
(e) Two of whom shall be resident representatives. Resident representatives shall be
appointed by a majority vote of the other board members, and each resident representative
shall maintain a primary residence within one of the twenty municipalities containing the
highest percentage of tax delinquent parcels;] The county council may, as part of such
ordinance, resolution, or rule, provide for the qualifications for members of the board of
directors. The board of directors of the land bank agency shall consist of seven
members appointed by the county executive pursuant to the authority vested in that
office by the county charter. The following requirements shall apply to the board of
directors:
[(2)] (1) The term of office of a member shall be four years. Each member's primary
residence shall be in the county that has established the land bank agency. Each member
serves at the pleasure of the member's appointing authority, may be an employee of the
appointing authority, and shall serve without compensation;
[(3)] (2) No public officer shall be eligible to serve as a board member. For purposes
of this subdivision, "public officer" means a person who is holding an elected public office.
Any public employee shall be eligible to serve as a board member;
[(4)] (3) The members of the board shall select annually from among themselves a
chair, a vice chair, a treasurer, and such other officers as the board may determine and shall
establish the officers' duties, as may be regulated by rules adopted by the board;

HB 2898 7
[(5)] (4) The board shall establish rules and requirements relative to the attendance
and participation of members in its meetings, regular or special. Such rules and regulations
may prescribe a procedure whereby, if any member fails to comply with such rules and
regulations, such member may be disqualified and removed automatically from office by no
less than a majority vote of the remaining members of the board, and that member's position
shall be vacant as of the first day of the next calendar month. Any person removed under the
provisions of this subdivision shall be ineligible for reappointment to the board unless such
reappointment is confirmed unanimously by the board;
[(6)] (5) A vacancy on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment[. If any appointing authority fails to make any appointment of a board member
within sixty days after any term expires, the appointment shall be made by the county
council] within sixty days and shall be done in compliance with the county charter;
[(7)] (6) Board members shall serve without compensation. The board may
reimburse any member for expenses actually incurred in the performance of duties on behalf
of the land bank agency;
[(8)] (7) The board shall have the power to organize and reorganize the executive,
administrative, clerical, and other departments of the land bank agency and to fix the duties,
powers, and compensation of all employees, agents, and consultants of the land bank agency;
[(9)] (8) The board shall meet in regular session according to a schedule adopted by
the board and also shall meet in special session as convened by the chair or upon written
notice signed by a majority of the members. The presence of a majority of total membership,
excluding vacancies, shall constitute a quorum;
[(10)] (9) All actions of the board shall be approved by the affirmative vote of a
majority of the members of that board present and voting. However, no action of the board
shall be authorized on the following matters unless approved by a majority of the total board
membership:
(a) Adoption, amendment, or repeal of bylaws and other rules and regulations for
conduct of the land bank agency's business;
(b) Hiring or firing of any employee or contractor of the land bank agency. This
function may, by majority vote, be delegated by the board to a specified officer or committee
of the land bank agency under such terms and conditions and to the extent that the board may
specify;
(c) Adoption or amendment of the annual budget; and
(d) Sale, encumbrance, or alienation of real property, improvements, or personal
property;

HB 2898 8
[(11)] (10) The governing body of the county establishing a land bank agency may
incur debt, including, without limitation, borrowing moneys and issuing bonds, notes, or other
obligations to provide funding for the land bank agency;
[(12)] (11) Members of a board shall not be liable personally on the bonds or other
obligations of the land bank agency, and the rights of creditors shall be solely against such
land bank agency; and
[(13)] (12) Vote by proxy shall not be permitted. Any member may request a
recorded vote on any resolution or action of the land bank agency.
2. If a municipality establishes a land bank agency under subsection 1 of section
140.981, the ordinance, resolution, or rule, as applicable, may specify the following:
(1) The name of the land bank agency;
(2) The number of members of the board of directors, which shall consist of an odd
number of members and shall be no fewer than five members nor more than eleven members;
(3) The initial individuals to serve as members of the board of directors and the length
of terms for which the members are to serve; and
(4) The qualifications, manner of selection or appointment, and terms of office of
members of the board.
3. A land bank agency may employ a secretary, an executive director, its own counsel
and legal staff, technical experts, and other agents and employees, permanent or temporary, as
it may require and may determine the qualifications and fix the compensation and benefits of
such persons. A land bank agency may also enter into contracts and agreements with political
subdivisions for staffing services to be provided to the land bank agency by political
subdivisions or agencies or departments thereof, or for a land bank agency to provide such
staffing services to political subdivisions or agencies or departments thereof.
140.983. A land bank agency established under the chapter 140 land bank act shall
have all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate the purposes and
provisions of the chapter 140 land bank act, including the following powers in addition to
those herein otherwise granted:
(1) To adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the
conduct of its business;
(2) To sue and be sued, in its own name, and plead and be impleaded in all civil
actions including, but not limited to, actions to clear title to property of the land bank agency;
(3) To adopt a seal and to alter the same at pleasure;
(4) To borrow from the political subdivision establishing the land bank agency, as
may be necessary for the operation and work of the land bank agency;
(5) To procure insurance or guarantees from political subdivisions, the state, the
federal government, or any other public or private sources of the payment of any bond, note,

HB 2898 9
loan, or other obligation, or portion thereof, incurred by the land bank agency and to pay any
fees or premiums in connection therewith;
(6) To enter into contracts and other instruments necessary, incidental, or convenient
to the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers including, but not limited to,
agreements with other land bank agencies and with political subdivisions for the joint
exercise of powers under this chapter;
(7) To enter into contracts and other instruments necessary, incidental, or convenient
to:
(a) The performance of functions by the land bank agency on behalf of political
subdivisions, or agencies or departments thereof; or
(b) The performance by political subdivisions, or agencies or departments thereof, of
functions on behalf of the land bank agency;
(8) To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to
the exercise of the powers of the land bank agency;
(9) To procure insurance against losses in connection with the property, assets, or
activities of the land bank agency;
(10) To invest the [moneys] money of the land bank agency in the same manner as
moneys are invested by the state treasurer, including amounts deposited in reserve or sinking
funds, at the discretion of the land bank agency in obligations or property determined proper
by the land bank agency and to name and use depositories for its moneys;
(11) To enter into contracts for the management of or the sale of the property of the
land bank agency;
(12) To design, develop for public use, construct, demolish, reconstruct, rehabilitate,
renovate, relocate, equip, furnish, and otherwise improve real property or rights or interests in
real property held by the land bank agency;
(13) To acquire property, whether by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, or otherwise,
except not property not wholly located in the county or municipality that established the land
bank agency; to grant or acquire licenses and easements; and to sell, grant an option with
respect to, or otherwise dispose of, any property of the land bank agency;
(14) To enter into partnerships, joint ventures, and other collaborative relationships
with political subdivisions and other public and private entities for the management,
development, and disposition of real property, except not for property not wholly located in
the county or municipality that established the land bank agency; and
(15) Subject to the other provisions of this chapter and all other applicable laws, to do
all other things necessary or convenient to achieve the objectives and purposes of the land
bank agency or other laws that relate to the purposes and responsibility of the land bank
agency.

HB 2898 10
140.984. 1. The income of a land bank agency shall be exempt from all taxation by
the state and by any of its political subdivisions. Upon acquiring title to any real estate, a land
bank agency shall immediately notify the county assessor and the county collector of such
ownership; all taxes, special taxes, fines, and fees on such real estate shall be deemed satisfied
by transfer to the land bank agency; and such property shall be exempt from all taxation
during the land bank agency's ownership thereof, in the same manner and to the same extent
as any other publicly owned real estate. Upon the sale or other disposition of any real estate
held by it, the land bank agency shall immediately notify the county assessor and the county
collector of such change of ownership. However, that such tax exemption for improved and
occupied real property held by the land bank agency as a lessor pursuant to a ground lease
shall terminate upon the first occupancy[, and]. The land bank agency shall immediately
notify the county assessor and the county collector of such occupancy.
2. A land bank agency may acquire real property by gift, devise, transfer, exchange,
foreclosure, purchase, or pursuant to sections 141.560 to 141.580 or section 141.819, except a
land bank agency shall not acquire property located partially or wholly outside the boundaries
of the county or municipality that established such land bank agency.
3. A land bank agency may acquire property by purchase contracts, lease purchase
agreements, installment sales contracts, and land contracts and may accept transfers from
political subdivisions upon such terms and conditions as agreed to by the land bank agency
and the political subdivision. A land bank agency may bid on any parcel of real estate offered
for sale, offered at a foreclosure sale under sections 140.220 to 140.250, offered at a sale
conducted under section 140.190, 140.240, or 140.250, or offered at a foreclosure sale under
section 141.550. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any political subdivision
may transfer to the land bank agency real property and interests in real property of the
political subdivision on such terms and conditions and according to such procedures as
determined by the political subdivision.
4. A land bank agency shall maintain all of its real property in accordance with the
laws and ordinances of the jurisdictions in which the real property is located.
5. Upon issuance of a deed to a parcel of real estate to a land bank agency under
subsection 4 of section 140.250, subsection 5 of section 140.405, other sale conducted under
section 140.190, 140.240, or 140.250, or section 141.550, the land bank agency shall pay only
the amount of the land bank agency's bid that exceeds the amount of all tax bills included in
the judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees, taxes, and costs then due thereon. If the real
estate is acquired in a delinquent land tax auction under subsection 4 of section 140.250,
subsection 5 of section 140.405, or other sale conducted under section 140.190, 140.240, or
140.250, such excess shall be applied and distributed in accordance with section 140.230. If
the real estate is acquired in a delinquent land tax auction under section 141.550, such excess

HB 2898 11
shall be applied and distributed in accordance with subsections 3 and 4 of section 141.580,
exclusive of subdivision (3) of subsection 3 of section 141.580. Upon issuance of a deed, the
county collector shall mark the tax bills included in the judgment as "cancelled by sale to the
land bank" and shall take credit for the full amount of such tax bills, including principal
amount, interest, penalties, attorney's fees, and costs, on the county collector's books and in
the county collector's statements with any other taxing authorities.
6. A land bank shall not own real property unless the property is wholly located
within the boundaries of the county or municipality that established the land bank agency.
7. Within one year of the effective date of the ordinance, resolution, or rule passed
establishing a municipal land bank agency under subsection 2 of section 140.981, the title to
any real property that is located wholly within the municipality that created the land bank
agency and that is held by a land trust created under subsection 1 of section 141.819 shall be
transferred by deed from the land trust to such land bank agency, at the land bank agency's
request.
140.985. 1. A land bank agency shall hold in its own name all real property acquired
by such land bank agency, irrespective of the identity of the transferor of such property.
2. A land bank agency shall maintain and make available for public review and
inspection an inventory and history of all real property the land bank agency holds or
formerly held. This inventory and history shall be available on the land bank agency's
website and include at a minimum:
(1) Whether a parcel is available for sale;
(2) The address of the parcel if an address has been assigned;
(3) The parcel number if no address has been assigned;
(4) The month and year that a parcel entered the land bank agency's inventory;
(5) Whether a parcel has sold;
(6) If a parcel has sold, the name of the person or entity to which it was sold; and
(7) Whether the parcel was acquired by the land bank agency through judicial
foreclosure, nonjudicial foreclosure, donation, or some other manner.
3. The land bank agency shall determine and set forth in policies and procedures the
general terms and conditions for consideration to be received by the land bank agency for the
transfer of real property and interests in real property. Consideration may take the form of
monetary payments and secured financial obligations, covenants, and conditions related to the
present and future use of the property; contractual commitments of the transferee; and such
other forms of consideration as the land bank agency determines to be in the best interest of
the land bank agency.
4. A land bank agency may convey, exchange, sell, transfer, grant, release and
demise, pledge, and hypothecate any and all interests in, upon, or to property of the land bank

HB 2898 12
agency. A land bank agency may gift any interest in, upon, or to property to the county or
municipality that established the land bank agency.
5. A county or municipality may, in its resolution, ordinance, or rule creating a land
bank agency, establish a hierarchical ranking of priorities for the use of real property
conveyed by such land bank agency, including, but not limited to:
(1) Use for purely public spaces and places;
(2) Use as wildlife conservation areas;
(3) Use as a green field area; and
(4) To return to private use.

If a county or municipality, in its resolution, ordinance, or rule creating a land bank agency,
establishes priorities for the use of real property conveyed by the land bank agency, such
priorities shall be consistent with and no more restrictive than municipal planning and zoning
ordinances.
6. The land bank agency may delegate to officers and employees the authority to
enter into and execute agreements, instruments of conveyance, and all other related
documents pertaining to the conveyance of property by the land bank agency.
7. Any property sold by a land bank agency that was acquired through purchase,
transfer, exchange, or gift shall be sold.
8. When any parcel of real estate acquired by a land bank agency is sold or otherwise
disposed of by such land bank agency, the proceeds therefrom shall be applied and distributed
in the following order:
(1) To the payment of the expenses of the sale;
(2) To fulfill the requirements of the resolution, indenture, or other financing
documents adopted or entered into in connection with bonds, notes, or other obligations of the
land bank agency, to the extent that such requirements may apply with respect to such parcel
of real estate;
(3) To the land bank agency to pay the salaries and other expenses of such land bank
agency and of its employees as provided for in its annual budget; and
(4) Any funds in excess of those necessary to meet the expenses of the annual budget
of the land bank agency in any fiscal year and a reasonable sum to carry over into the next
fiscal year to assure that sufficient funds will be available to meet initial expenses for that
next fiscal year shall be paid to the respective taxing authorities that, at the time of the
distribution, are taxing the real property from which the proceeds are being distributed. The
distributions shall be in proportion to the amounts of the taxes levied on the properties by the
taxing authorities. Distribution shall be made on January first and July first of each year, and
at such other times as the land bank agency may determine.

HB 2898 13
140.986. 1. No later than five years from the date it acquired the property, a land
bank agency shall either sell, put to a productive use, or show significant progress towards
selling or putting the property to a productive use [a parcel of real property]. A productive
use may be demolishing all structures of the property or using the property for a community
garden, park, or other open public space. No later than eight years from the date it acquired
the property, a land bank agency shall sell, clear, or put such property to public use.
2. The governing body of the county or municipality may grant the land bank agency
a one-year extension if the body determines by a majority vote that unforeseen circumstances
have delayed the sale or productive use of a parcel of property.
3. If a land bank agency owns a parcel of real property that does not have a productive
use after five years, or does not receive an extension under subsection 2 of this section, the
property shall be offered for public sale using the procedures under sections 140.170 to
140.190.
140.987. 1. A land bank agency shall require that any buyer demonstrate that the
buyer is not the owner of any parcel of real estate within the county or municipality that
created the land bank agency for which a tax bill has been delinquent for more than one year
or is in violation of any municipal building or housing code[, and is not the original owner or
relative of such owner within the second degree of consanguinity of the parcel sold,
transferred, exchanged, or gifted to the land bank agency].
2. No foreign or domestic corporation or limited liability company that has failed to
appoint or maintain a registered agent under chapter 347 or 351 shall be eligible to buy
property from the land bank agency. No foreign corporate entity shall be eligible to buy
property from the land bank agency unless it has a certificate of authority to transact business
in Missouri under section 351.572.
3. As a condition of the sale or other authorized conveyance of ownership of any
parcel of land owned by the land bank agency to a private owner, such owner may be required
to enter into a contract, which may be secured by a deed of trust in favor of the land bank
agency, stipulating that such owner or the owner's successor agrees that such owner or the
owner's successor make certain improvements to the parcel. If the land bank agency finds by
resolution that the terms of the contract have not been satisfied, the land bank agency shall be
authorized to bring suit to recover damages for the breach and to seek a judicial foreclosure of
the parcel under sections 443.190 to 443.260, except that upon final judgment of the court,
title shall revert to the land bank agency without necessity of sale. As an alternative to, or in
addition to, seeking a judicial foreclosure, the land bank agency may, only by gift, assign or
convey its right to foreclose under sections 443.190 to 443.260 to any 501(c)(3) tax-exempt
nonprofit organization or exercise the right of reentry under chapter 524, 527, or 534. The
land bank agency or its assignee shall assume title to the land by filing a copy of the judgment

HB 2898 14
with the recorder of deeds in the county where the property is located. Any property
redeemed by the land bank agency under the provisions of this section shall be administered
in the same manner as other property sold to the land bank agency.
140.988. 1. (1) A land bank agency may receive funding through grants and gifts
from political subdivisions, the state, the federal government, and other public and private
sources.
(2) A land bank agency may receive funding through gifts from any source, provided
that the land bank agency shall not sell or otherwise transfer by any means any real property
held by the land bank agency to the entity from which the land bank agency received a gift
[pursuant to this subdivision].
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 of section 140.985, a land bank
agency may receive and retain payments for services rendered, for consideration for
disposition of real and personal property, for proceeds of insurance coverage for losses
incurred, for income from investments, and for any other asset and activity lawfully permitted
to a land bank agency under the chapter 140 land bank act.
3. If a land bank agency sells or otherwise disposes of a parcel of real estate held by
it, any land taxes assessed against such parcel for the three tax years following such sale or
disposition by such land bank agency that are collected by the county collector in a calendar
year and not refunded, less the fees provided under section 52.260 and subsection 4 of this
section and less the amounts to be deducted under section 137.720, shall be distributed by the
county collector to such land bank agency no later than March first of the following calendar
year, provided that land taxes impounded under section 139.031 or otherwise paid under
protest shall not be subject to distribution under this subsection. Any amount required to be
distributed to a land bank agency under this subsection shall be subject to offset for amounts
previously distributed to such land bank agency that were assessed, collected, or distributed in
error.
4. In addition to any other provisions of law related to collection fees, the county
collector shall collect on behalf of the county a fee of four percent of reserve period taxes
collected and such fees collected shall be deposited in the county general fund.
5. If a county has established a land bank agency under subsection 1 of section
140.981, the collector may collect on behalf of the county a fee for the collection of
delinquent and back taxes of up to five percent on all sums collected to be added to the face of
the tax bill and collected from the party paying the tax. All fees collected under the
provisions of this subsection shall be paid to the land bank agency established under
subsection 1 of section 140.981.
140.991. 1. There shall be an annual audit of the affairs, accounts, expenses, and
financial transactions of a land bank agency by a certified public accountant before April

HB 2898 15
thirtieth of each year, which accountant shall be employed by the land bank agency on or
before March first of each year. Certified copies of the audit shall be furnished to the county
or municipality that established the land bank agency, and the county or municipality shall
post the audit on its [public] website. Copies of the audit shall also be available for public
inspection at the office of the land bank agency.
2. The land bank agency may be performance audited at any time by the state auditor
or by the auditor of the county or municipality that established the land bank agency. The
land bank agency shall make copies of such audit available to the public and shall post a copy
of the audit on the land bank agency's website within thirty days of the completion of the
audit.
140.994. 1. A land bank agency shall have power to receive funds from bonds issued
by the county or municipality that created the land bank agency, for any of its [corporate]
purposes. The bonds shall be special, limited obligations of the county or municipality that
created the land bank agency, the principal of and interest on which shall be payable solely
from the income and revenue derived from the sale, or other disposition of the assets of the
land bank agency, or such portion thereof as may be designated in the resolution, indenture, or
other financing documents relating to the issuance of the bonds.
2. Bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to be an indebtedness
within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation upon the incurring of
indebtedness. The bonds shall not constitute a debt, liability, or obligation of the state or a
pledge of the full faith and credit or the taxing power of the state and the bonds shall contain a
recital to that effect. Neither the members of the board nor any person executing the bonds
shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.
3. Bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be authorized by resolution of the
governing body of the county or municipality establishing the land bank agency, shall be
issued in such form, shall be in such denominations, shall bear interest at such rate or rates,
shall mature on such dates and in such manner, shall be subject to redemption at such times
and on such terms, and shall be executed by one or more members of the governing body of
the county or municipality establishing the land bank agency, as provided in the resolution
authorizing the issuance thereof or as set out in the indenture or other financing document
authorized and approved by such resolution. The governing body of the county or
municipality establishing the land bank agency may sell such bonds in such manner, either at
public or at private sale, and for such price as the governing body of the county or
municipality establishing the land bank agency may determine to be in the best interests of the
land bank agency.
4. A governing body of the county or municipality establishing the land bank agency
may from time to time, as authorized by resolution of the governing body, issue refunding

HB 2898 16
bonds for the purpose of refunding, extending, and unifying all or any part of its valid
outstanding bonds. Such refunding bonds may be payable from any of the sources identified
in subsection 1 of this section and from the investment of any of the proceeds of the refunding
bonds.
5. The bonds issued by the governing body of the county or municipality establishing
the land bank agency shall be negotiable instruments under chapter 400.
6. Bonds issued under this section and all income or interest thereon shall be exempt
from all state taxes.
7. The governing body of the county or municipality establishing the land bank
agency shall have the power to issue temporary notes upon the same terms and subject to all
provisions and restrictions applicable to bonds under this section. Such notes issued by the
governing body may be refunded by notes or bonds authorized under this section.
140.995. Notwithstanding any provision of sections 140.980 to 140.995 to the
contrary, a land bank agency may rent or lease property held by the land bank agency for any
community, noncommercial, or agricultural uses.
140.1000. 1. No board member or employee of a land bank agency shall receive any
compensation, emolument, or other profit directly or indirectly from the rental, management,
acquisition, sale, demolition, repair, rehabilitation, use, operation, ownership, or disposition
of any [lands] property held by such land bank agency other than the salaries, expenses, and
emoluments provided for in the chapter 140 land bank act.
2. No member of the board or employee of a land bank agency shall own, directly or
indirectly, any legal or equitable interest in or to any lands held by such land bank agency
other than the salaries, expenses, and emoluments provided for in sections 140.980 to
140.1015.
3. A violation of this section is a class D felony.
4. The land bank agency may adopt supplemental rules and regulations addressing
potential conflicts of interest and ethical guidelines for board members and land bank agency
employees, provided that such rules and regulations are not inconsistent with this chapter or
any other applicable law.
5. Any person who is related to a board member or employee of a land bank agency
within the second degree of consanguinity or affinity shall be considered a board member or
employee of a land bank agency for purposes of this section and subject to its provisions.
140.1009. 1. A land bank agency shall be authorized to file an action to quiet title
under section 527.150 [as to] for any real property in which the land bank agency has an
interest. For purposes of any and all such actions, the land bank agency shall be deemed to be
the holder of sufficient legal and equitable interests, and possessory rights, so as to qualify the
land bank agency as an adequate petitioner in such action.

HB 2898 17
2. Prior to the filing of an action to quiet title, the land bank agency shall conduct an
examination of title to determine the identity of any and all persons and entities possessing a
claim or interest in or to the real property. Service of the petition to quiet title shall be
provided to all such interested parties by the following methods:
(1) Registered or certified mail to such identity and address as reasonably
ascertainable by an inspection of public records;
(2) In the case of occupied real property, by first class mail addressed to "Occupant";
(3) By posting a copy of the notice on the real property;
(4) By publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or municipality
in which the property is located; and
(5) Such other methods as the court may order or as may be required by prevailing
motions of due process.
3. As part of the petition to quiet title, the land bank agency shall file an affidavit
identifying all parties potentially having an interest in the real property and the form of notice
provided.
4. The court shall schedule a hearing on the petition within ninety days following
filing of the petition and, as to all matters upon which an answer was not filed by an interested
party, the court shall issue its final judgment within one hundred twenty days of the filing of
the petition.
5. A land bank agency shall be authorized to join in a single petition to quiet title one
or more parcels of real property.
140.1012. 1. A land bank agency shall be dissolved as a public body corporate and
politic no sooner than sixty calendar days, but no later than one hundred eighty calendar days,
after an ordinance or resolution for such dissolution is passed by the county or municipality
that established the land bank agency.
2. [No less than sixty calendar days' advance written notice of consideration of] If
such an ordinance or resolution of dissolution is being considered, no less than sixty
calendar days advance written notice shall be given to the land bank agency, shall be
published in a local newspaper of general circulation within such county or municipality, and
shall be sent certified mail to each trustee of any outstanding bonds of the land bank agency.
3. No land bank agency shall be dissolved while there remains any outstanding bonds,
notes, or other obligations of the land bank agency unless such bonds, notes, or other
obligations are paid or defeased pursuant to the resolution, indenture, or other financing
document under which such bonds, notes, or other obligations were issued prior to or
simultaneously with such dissolution. Once all outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations
are satisfied, no new property shall be purchased by, gifted to, traded to, or exchanged with
the land bank agency. No further debts or other obligations shall be incurred other than that

HB 2898 18
which is necessary to sell or put to public use any remaining property held by the land bank
agency. The land bank agency shall be dissolved within thirty days after all outstanding
bonds, notes, or other obligations are satisfied.
4. Upon dissolution of a land bank agency pursuant to this section, all real property,
personal property, and other assets of the land bank agency shall be transferred by appropriate
written instrument to and shall become the assets of the county or municipality that
established the land bank agency. Such county or municipality shall act expeditiously to
return such real property to the tax rolls and shall market and sell such real property using an
open, public method that ensures the best possible prices are realized while ensuring such real
property is returned to a suitable, productive use for the betterment of the neighborhood in
which such real property is located. Upon the sale or other disposition of any such property
by such county or municipality, the proceeds therefrom shall be applied and distributed in the
following order:
(1) To the payment of the expenses of sale;
(2) To the reasonable costs incurred by such county or municipality in maintaining
and marketing such property; and
(3) The balance shall be paid to the respective taxing authorities that, at the time of
the distribution, are taxing the real property from which the proceeds are being distributed.
141.220. The following words, terms and definitions, when used in sections 141.210
to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this
section, except where the text clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) "Ancillary parcel" shall mean a parcel of real estate acquired by a land bank
agency other than:
(a) Pursuant to a deemed sale under subsection 3 of section 141.560;
(b) By deed from a land trust under subsection 1 of section 141.984; or
(c) Pursuant to a sale under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 141.550;
(2) "Appraiser" shall mean a state licensed or certified appraiser licensed or certified
pursuant to chapter 339 who is not an employee of the collector or collection authority;
(3) "Board" or "board of commissioners" shall mean the board of commissioners of a
land bank agency;
(4) "Collector" shall mean the collector of the revenue in any county affected by
sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015;
(5) "County" shall mean any county in this state;
(6) "Court" shall mean the circuit court of any county affected by sections 141.210 to
141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015;
(7) "Delinquent land tax attorney" shall mean a licensed attorney-at-law, employed or
designated by the collector as hereinafter provided;

HB 2898 19
(8) "Interested party", shall mean any person with a legal interest in a parcel of land
affected by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015. Interested party
shall not include:
(a) The holder of the benefit or burden of any easement or right of way;
(b) The holder of a benefit or burden of a real covenant; or
(c) A leasehold owner of subsurface mineral, gas, or oil rights whose interest is
properly recorded and whose interest shall remain unaffected;
(9) "Land bank agency", shall mean [an] any agency created under section 141.980;
(10) "Land taxes" shall mean taxes on real property or real estate and shall include the
taxes both on land and the improvements thereon;
(11) "Land trustees" and "land trust" shall mean the land trustees and land trust as the
same are created by and described in section 141.700;
(12) "Municipality" shall include any incorporated city or town, or a part thereof,
located in whole or in part within a county;
(13) "Person" shall mean any individual, firm, copartnership, joint adventure,
association, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver or trustee appointed by any state
or federal court, trustee otherwise created, syndicate, or any other group or combination
acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular number;
(14) "Political subdivision" shall mean any county, city, town, village, school district,
library district, or any other public subdivision or public corporation having the power to tax;
(15) "Reserve period taxes" shall mean land taxes assessed against any parcel of real
estate sold or otherwise disposed of by a land bank agency for the first three tax years
following such sale or disposition;
(16) "School district", "road district", "water district", "sewer district", "levee
district", "drainage district", "special benefit district", "special assessment district", or "park
district" shall include those located within a county as such county is described in this section;
(17) "Sheriff" and "circuit clerk" shall mean the sheriff and circuit clerk, respectively,
of any county affected by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015;
(18) "Tax bill" as used in sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to
141.1015 shall represent real estate taxes and the lien thereof, whether general or special,
levied and assessed by any taxing authority;
(19) "Tax district" shall mean the state of Missouri and any county, municipality,
school district, road district, water district, sewer district, levee district, drainage district,
special benefit district, special assessment district, or park district, located in any municipality
or county as herein described;
(20) "Tax lien" shall mean the lien of any tax bill as defined in this section;

HB 2898 20
(21) "Taxing authority" shall include any governmental, managing, administering or
other lawful authority, now or hereafter empowered by law to issue tax bills, the state of
Missouri or any county, municipality, school district, road district, water district, sewer
district, levee district, drainage district, special benefit district, special assessment district, or
park district, affected by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015.
141.230. 1. The land tax collection law shall apply to all counties that have elected to
operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 by adoption of a resolution or
order of the county commission of such county.
2. Alternatively, any county may, by adoption of a resolution or order of the county
commission of such county, elect to operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
141.810 as a partial opt-in county. After adoption of any such resolution or order, the
collector for such county may elect to operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
141.810 for any parcel [or parcels for which there is an unpaid tax bill for a period of at least
two years after the date on which it became delinquent].
3. No county eligible to establish a land bank agency under subsection 1 of section
140.981 shall elect to operate as a partial opt-in county unless having first elected to establish
a land bank agency as provided in subsection 1 of section 140.981.
4. Any county commission so adopting such resolution or order shall file a certified
copy thereof within ten days after the adoption of said resolution or order with the clerk of the
county commission and with the collector of revenue for such county, and with the mayor and
city collector or chief financial officer of each municipality in such county, as defined by
section 141.220.
5. After the adoption of such resolution or order by such county commission, each
municipality shall cooperate with such county under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
141.810. Any such county which shall, in the manner provided herein, have elected to come
within the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810, in whole or in part, by adoption of such
resolution, order or ordinance, may, after a period of one year from the effective date of such
resolution, order or ordinance, adopt by similar means a resolution, order or ordinance,
rescinding the election to adopt the provisions of the land tax collection law and certified
copies of such resolution, order or ordinance shall be filed in the same manner as said original
resolution, order or ordinance; provided, that such resolution, order or ordinance rescinding or
nullifying the election to adopt the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 shall not
become effective for one year thereafter nor shall it invalidate or in any way affect any
proceedings in rem for foreclosure which may have been instituted under the provisions of
sections 141.210 to 141.810, but all such actions and proceedings so instituted while the
provisions of said sections were in full force and effect shall be prosecuted to their conclusion
and completion; provided further, that any county which may have operated under sections

HB 2898 21
141.210 to 141.810 prior to the enactment of this section may hereafter elect to terminate any
further operation under sections 141.210 to 141.810 by proceeding in manner and form and to
the same effect as though it had originally elected to operate under the provisions of sections
141.210 to 141.810.
6. Any municipality located partly within a county electing to operate in whole or in
part under the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 shall cooperate with such county
under the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810; provided, however, that tax bills
imposed against real estate located in that part of such municipality outside of the limits of
any such county shall be collected under other provisions as may be provided by law.
141.250. 1. The respective liens of the tax bills for general taxes of the state of
Missouri, the county, any municipality, and any school district, for the same tax year, shall be
equal and first liens upon the real estate described in the respective tax bills thereof; provided,
however, that the liens of such tax bills for the latest year for which tax bills are unpaid shall
take priority over the liens of tax bills levied and assessed for less recent years, and the lien of
such tax bills shall rate in priority in the order of the years for which the tax bills are
delinquent, the lien of the tax bill longest delinquent being junior in priority to the lien of the
tax bill for the next most recent tax year.
2. All tax bills for other than general taxes shall constitute liens junior to the liens for
general taxes upon the real estate described therein; provided, however, that a tax bill for
other than general taxes, of the more recent issue shall likewise be senior to any such tax bill
of less recent date.
3. The proceeds derived from the sale of any lands encumbered with a tax lien or liens
shall be distributed to the owners of such liens in the order of the seniority of the liens. Those
holding liens of equal rank shall share in direct proportion to the amounts of their respective
liens.
141.270. 1. On or before the fifth day of January in each year, all taxing authorities
and any other tax bill owner shall file a list with the collector [a list] on a form approved by
the collector of all parcels of real estate affected by tax liens held and owned by such taxing
authority or person which have been delinquent for two years or more. Such list shall also
include all delinquent tax bills for any and all years.
2. The taxing authority or person filing such list shall pay to the collector a filing fee
of one dollar and fifty cents for each parcel of real estate described therein, which fee shall be
charged against each parcel and collected and accounted for by the collector as other costs.
3. No school district nor any other taxing authority whose taxes are required by law to
be collected by the collector shall file any list nor pay the filing fee herein provided.

HB 2898 22
4. If the taxes of any taxing authority are two or more years delinquent, the other
taxing authorities and other tax bill owners shall include in the said list all tax liens against
the said parcel, even though the taxes are not two years delinquent.
141.290. 1. The collector shall compile lists of all state, county, school, and other tax
bills collectible by the collector that are delinquent according to the collector's records, and
the collector shall combine such lists with the list filed by any taxing authority or tax bill
owner.
2. For partial opt-in counties, the collector shall decide which tax delinquent parcels
shall proceed according to the provisions contained [herein] in this chapter. The remaining
parcels shall proceed under such other provisions as may be provided by law.
3. The collector shall assign a serial number to each parcel of real estate in each list
and if suit has been filed in the circuit court of the county on any delinquent tax bill included
in any list, the collector shall give the court docket number of such suit and some appropriate
designation of the place where such suit is pending, and such pending suit so listed in any
petition filed pursuant to the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980
to 141.1015 shall, without further procedure or court order, be deemed to be consolidated
with the suit brought under sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015,
and such pending suit shall thereupon be abated.
4. The collector shall deliver such combined lists to the delinquent land tax attorney
from time to time but not later than April first of each year.
5. The delinquent land tax attorney shall incorporate such lists in petitions in the form
prescribed in section 141.410, and shall file such petitions with the circuit clerk not later than
June first of each year.
141.300. 1. The collector shall receipt for the aggregate amount of such delinquent
tax bills appearing on the list or lists filed with the collector under the provisions of section
141.290, which receipt shall be held by the owner or holder of the tax bills or by the treasurer
or other corresponding financial officer of the taxing authority [so] filing such list with the
collector.
2. The collector shall, on or before the fifth day of each month, file with the owner or
holder of any tax bill or with the treasurer or other corresponding financial officer of any
taxing authority, a detailed statement, verified by affidavit, of all taxes collected by the
collector during the preceding month which appear on the list or lists received by the
collector, and shall, on or before the fifteenth day of the month, pay the same, less the
collector's commissions and costs payable to the county, to the tax bill owner or holder or to
the treasurer or other corresponding financial officer of any taxing authority; provided,
however, that the collector shall be given credit for the full amount of any tax bill where title
to the real estate described in such tax bill is taken by a land trust, or which is bid on by a land

HB 2898 23
bank agency and where title to the real estate described in such tax bill is taken by such land
bank agency pursuant to a deemed sale under subsection 3 of section 141.560, or which is
included in the bid of a land bank agency and where title to the real estate described in such
tax bill is taken by such land bank agency pursuant to a sale under subdivision (2) of
subsection 2 of section 141.550.
141.320. 1. The collector shall,at the collector's option,appoint a delinquent land tax
attorney, to be compensated as necessary for the performance of the collector's duties under
this chapter, or in counties having a county counselor, the collector shall, at the collector's
option, designate the county counselor and such of the counselor's assistants as shall appear
necessary to act as the delinquent land tax attorney.
2. A delinquent land tax attorney who is not the county counselor, with the approval
of the collector, may appoint one or more assistant delinquent land tax attorneys and such
clerical employees as may be necessary, to be compensated as necessary for the performance
of duties under this chapter; and the appointed delinquent tax attorney may incur such
reasonable expenses as are necessary for the performance of the attorney's duties.
3. The delinquent land tax attorney and the attorney's assistants shall perform legal
services for the collector and shall act as attorney for the collector in the prosecution of all
suits brought for the collection of land taxes; but the attorney and the collector shall not
perform legal services for the land trust or any land bank agency.
4. Salaries and expenses of a delinquent land tax attorney who is not also the county
counselor, the attorney's assistants, and the attorney's employees shall be paid monthly out of
the treasury of the county from the same funds as employees of the collector whenever the
funds provided for by sections 141.150, 141.270, and 141.620 are not sufficient for such
purpose.
5. The compensation herein provided shall be the total compensation for a delinquent
land tax attorney who is not also a county counselor, and the attorney's assistants and
employees.
6. A delinquent land tax attorney who is not also the county counselor shall make a
return quarterly to the county commission of such county of all compensation received by the
attorney, and of all amounts owing to the attorney by the collector, and of all salaries and
expenses of any assistants and employees, stating the same in detail, and verifying such
amounts by affidavit.
7. The attorney's fees shall be taxed as costs in the suit and collected as other costs.
141.330. The collector [annually] may appoint one delinquent land tax clerk in each
office lawfully maintained by the collector in the county, to be compensated as necessary for
the performance of the clerk's duties under this chapter.

HB 2898 24
141.360. All suits for the foreclosure of tax liens brought by the collector shall name
the collector only by the title of the collector's office, and all such suits shall be brought
directly against the real estate subject to the tax lien or liens to be foreclosed.
141.410. 1. A suit for the foreclosure of the tax liens herein provided for shall be
instituted by filing in the appropriate office of the circuit clerk a petition[, which]. Such
petition shall contain a caption, a copy of the list so furnished to the delinquent land tax
attorney by the collector, and a prayer. The petition shall name each person with a legal
interest in the parcel of land affected by the suit, as reasonably discoverable to the collector
from publicly available records. Such petition without further allegation shall be deemed to
be sufficient.
2. The caption shall be in the following form:
In the Circuit Court of ______ County, Missouri,
In the Matter of
Foreclosure of Liens for Delinquent Land Taxes
By Action in Rem.
Collector of Revenue of ______ County, Missouri,
Plaintiff
-vs.-
Parcels of Land Encumbered with Delinquent Tax Liens
Defendants
3. The petition shall contain at least the following information:
(1) The identity of the petitioner and the name and address of the collector;
(2) The parcel's common street address;
(3) A full legal description for the parcel;
(4) The tax identification number of the parcel;
(5) The period of tax delinquency; and
(6) The principal amount of delinquent taxes, together with interest, penalties, and
fees.
4. The petition shall conclude with a prayer that all tax liens upon such real estate be
foreclosed; that the court determine the amounts and priorities of all tax bills, together with
interest, penalties, costs, and attorney's fees; that the court order such real estate to be sold by
the sheriff at public sale as provided by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to
141.1015 and that thereafter a report of such sale be made by the sheriff to the court for
further proceedings under sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015.
5. The delinquent land tax attorney within ten days after the filing of any such petition
shall forward by United States registered mail to each person or taxing authority having filed
a list of delinquent tax bills with the collector as provided by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and

HB 2898 25
sections 141.980 to 141.1015 a notice of the time and place of the filing of such petition and
of the newspaper in which the notice of publication has been or will be published.
6. The petition when so filed shall have the same force and effect with respect to each
parcel of real estate therein described, as a separate suit instituted to foreclose the tax lien or
liens against any one of said parcels of real estate.
141.440. 1. Within thirty days after the filing of such petition, the collector shall
[also] cause to be prepared and sent by restricted, registered or certified mail with postage
prepaid, [within thirty days after the filing of such petition,] a notice of the petition, to the
persons named in the petition as being the last known persons in whose names tax bills
affecting the respective parcels of real estate described in said petition were last billed or
charged on the books of the collector, or the last known owner of record, if different, and to
the addresses of said persons upon said records of the collector. The terms "restricted",
"registered" or "certified mail" as used in this section mean mail which carries on the face
thereof in a conspicuous place, where it will not be obliterated, the endorsement "DELIVER
TO ADDRESSEE ONLY", and which also requires a return receipt or a statement by the
postal authorities that the addressee refused to receive and receipt for such mail. If the notice
is returned to the collector by the postal authorities as undeliverable for reasons other than the
refusal by the addressee to receive and receipt for the notice as shown by the return receipt,
then the collector shall make a search of the records maintained by the county, including those
kept by the recorder of deeds, to discern the name and address of any person who, from such
records, appears as a successor to the person to whom the original notice was addressed, and
to cause another notice to be mailed to such person. The collector shall prepare and file with
the circuit clerk at least thirty days before judgment is entered by the court on the petition an
affidavit reciting to the court any name, address and serial number of the tract of real estate
affected by any such notices of suit that are undeliverable because of an addressee's refusal to
receive and receipt for the same, or of any notice otherwise nondeliverable by mail, or in the
event that any name or address does not appear on the records of the collector, then of that
fact. The affidavit in addition to the recitals set forth above shall also state reason for the
nondelivery of such notice.
2. The collector shall prepare and send, by first-class mail, a copy of the petition
within thirty days after the filing of such a petition to the occupant of such parcel or property.
141.500. 1. After the trial of the issues, the court shall, as promptly as circumstances
permit, render judgment. If the court finds that no tax bill upon the land collectible by the
collector or the relator was delinquent when the suit was instituted or tried, then the judgment
of the court shall be that the cause be dismissed as to the parcels of real estate described in the
tax bill[; or,]. If the evidence warrant, the judgment may be for the principal amount of the
delinquent tax bills upon the real estate upon which suit was brought, together with interest,

HB 2898 26
penalties, attorney's and appraiser's fees and costs computed as of the date of the judgment.
The judgment may recite the amount of each tax bill, the date when it began to bear interest,
and the rate of such interest, together with the rate and amount of penalties, attorney's and
appraiser's fees not to exceed fifteen dollars. It may decree that the lien upon the parcels of
real estate described in the tax bill be foreclosed and such real estate sold by the sheriff, and
the cause shall be continued for further proceedings, as herein provided.
2. The collector shall cause to be prepared and sent by restricted, registered or
certified mail with postage prepaid, within thirty days after the rendering of such judgment, a
brief notice of such judgment and the availability of a written redemption contract pursuant to
section 141.530 to the persons named in the judgment as being the last known persons in
whose names tax bills affecting the respective parcels of real estate described in such
judgment were last billed or charged on the books of the collector, or the last known owner of
record, if different, and to the addresses of such persons upon the records of the collector.
The terms "restricted", "registered" or "certified mail" as used in this section mean mail which
carries on the face thereof in a conspicuous place, where it will not be obliterated, the
endorsement, "DELIVER TO ADDRESSEE ONLY", and which also requires a return receipt
or a statement by the postal authorities that the addressee refused to receive and receipt for
such mail. If the notice is returned to the collector by the postal authorities as undeliverable
for reasons other than the refusal by the addressee to receive and receipt for the notice as
shown by the return receipt, then the collector shall make a search of the records maintained
by the county, including those kept by the recorder of deeds, to discern the name and address
of any person who, from such records, appears as a successor to the person to whom the
original notice was addressed, and to cause another notice to be mailed to such person. The
collector shall prepare and file with the circuit clerk prior to confirmation hearings an
affidavit reciting to the court any name, address and serial number of the tract of real estate
affected of any such notices of judgment that are undeliverable because of an addressee's
refusal to receive and receipt for the same, or of any notice otherwise nondeliverable by mail,
or in the event that any name or address does not appear on the records of the collector, then
of that fact. The affidavit in addition to the recitals set forth above shall also state reason for
the nondelivery of such notice.
3. The collector shall prepare and send to the occupant of such parcel or property, by
first-class mail, a copy of the judgment of foreclosure within thirty days after the date of such
judgment.
141.520. 1. After the judgment of foreclosure has been entered, or, after a motion for
a new trial has been overruled, or, if an appeal be taken from such judgment and the judgment
has been affirmed, after the sheriff shall have been notified by any party to the suit that such
judgment has been affirmed on appeal and that the mandate of the appellate court is on file

HB 2898 27
with the circuit clerk, there shall be a waiting period of six months before any advertisement
of sheriff's sale shall be published.
2. If any such parcel of real estate [be] is not redeemed, or if no written contract
providing for redemption [be] is made within six months after the date of the judgment of
foreclosure, if no motion for rehearing [be] is filed, and, if filed, within six months after such
motion may have been overruled, or, if an appeal [be] is taken from such judgment and the
judgment [be] is affirmed, within six months after the sheriff shall have been notified by any
party to the suit that such judgment has been affirmed on appeal and that the mandate of the
appellate court is on file with the circuit clerk, the sheriff shall commence to advertise the real
estate described in the judgment and shall fix the date of sale within thirty days after the date
of the first publication of the notice of sheriff's sale as herein provided, and shall at such sale
proceed to sell the real estate.
3. Any provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the owner of any
parcel of real property against which a judgment has been rendered shall not have the right to
redeem such property from said judgment if at the time of judgment such property is assessed
as residential property and the judgment finds the property has been vacant for a period of not
less than six months prior to the judgment. After a judgment as provided for in this section
becomes final, the waiting period shall not apply to such judgment and a sale under execution
of the judgment shall be immediately held as provided under the applicable provisions of this
chapter.
4. In partial opt-in counties, no later than one hundred twenty days prior to the
sheriff's sale, the collector shall obtain from a licensed title company or attorney a title search
that includes all conveyances, liens, and charges against the real estate involved in the suit for
any parcel of real estate against which the collector has obtained a judgment under section
141.500 and for which it has been decreed that the lien upon the parcel of real estate described
in the tax bill be foreclosed and such real estate sold by the sheriff. The charge of such title
search may be recovered from the proceeds of the sale under section 141.580.
5. After obtaining or conducting a title search, the collector shall initiate a search of
the following records to identify and locate interested parties and addresses reasonably
calculated to apprise interested parties of the suit:
(1) Land title records in the office of the county recorder of deeds;
(2) Tax records in the office of the local treasurer;
(3) Tax records in the office of the local assessor;
(4) A search of court records in Missouri CaseNet; and
(5) For a business entity, records filed with the secretary of state.


HB 2898 28
The collector may also incur reasonable costs for web-based investigatory searches to
supplement the search for interested parties and addresses. The reasonable cost of locating
interested parties and addresses for notice may be recovered from the proceeds of the sale
under section 141.580.
6. No later than thirty days prior to the sheriff's sale, the collector shall send notice of
the sale to all interested parties at the address most likely to apprise interested parties of the
sale. The notice shall provide the date, time, and place of the sale and shall also state that the
parcel may be redeemed prior to the sale as specified in sections 141.420 and 141.530. The
notice required by this subsection shall be mailed first class, postage prepaid. The cost of
notice under this subsection may be recovered from the proceeds of the sale under section
141.580.
7. No later than twenty days prior to the sheriff's sale, the sheriff shall enter upon the
parcel subject to foreclosure of these tax liens and post a written informational notice in a
conspicuous location, attached to a structure, and intended to be visible by the nearest public
right-of-way. This notice shall describe the parcel and advise that it is the subject of
delinquent land tax collection proceedings brought under sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
sections 141.980 to 141.1015 and that it may be sold for the payment of delinquent taxes at a
sale to be held at a certain time, date, and place and shall also contain the tax identification
number and the phone number and address of the collector as well as a prohibition against
removal unless the parcel has been redeemed. The notice shall be not less than eight inches
by ten inches and shall be laminated or otherwise sufficiently weatherproof to withstand
normal exposure to rain, snow, and other conditions. The sheriff shall document, by time-
stamped photograph, compliance with this section, make such documentation generally
available upon request, and provide verification by affidavit of compliance with this section.
The cost of notice under this subsection may be recovered from the proceeds of the sale under
section 141.580.
8. In addition to the other notice requirements of this section, no later than twenty
days prior to the sheriff's sale, the sheriff shall attempt in-person notice that shall describe the
parcel and advise that it is the subject of delinquent land tax collection proceedings brought
under sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015; that shall state that it
may be sold for the payment of delinquent taxes at a sale to be held at a certain time, date, and
place; and that shall also contain the tax identification number and the phone number and
address of the collector. In-person notice may be provided to any person found at the parcel.
The sheriff shall note the date and time of attempted notice and the name, description, or other
identifying information regarding the person to whom notice was attempted. The sheriff shall
document compliance with this section, make such documentation generally available upon
request, and provide verification by affidavit of compliance with this section. The cost of

HB 2898 29
notice under this subsection may be recovered from the proceeds of the sale under section
141.580.
141.535. 1. If a parcel is the subject of an action filed under sections 447.620 to
447.640, the court shall stay the sale of any tax parcel to be sold under execution of a tax
foreclosure judgment obtained under this chapter, provided that the party which has brought
such an action has paid into the circuit court the principal amount of all [land] delinquent
taxes then due and owing under the tax foreclosure judgment, exclusive of penalties, interest,
attorney fees, and court costs, prior to the date of any proposed sale under execution. The
party bringing such action shall provide written notice of the filing of the action to the court
administrator and file with the circuit court in which the action is pending a certificate that
such notice has been provided to the court administrator. If the party that brought the action
under sections 447.620 to 447.640 dismisses its action prior to gaining temporary possession
of the property, it shall recover any amounts paid into the circuit court under this subsection.
2. In any order granting a sheriff's deed under section 447.625 or a judicial deed under
section 447.640, the court shall also order the permanent extinguishment of liability against
the grantee and the grantee's successors in interest for penalties, interest, attorney fees, and
court costs arising from actions to collect delinquent land taxes due on the subject property.
The funds paid into the court for land taxes under subsection 1 of this section shall then be
paid to the county collector.
3. If an owner of such a property moves the court for restoration of possession of the
subject property under section 447.638, the owner shall pay into the circuit court all land tax
amounts currently due and owing on the property, including all statutory penalties, interest,
attorney fees, and court costs retroactive to the date of accrual, and in the event that an owner
of the tax parcel regains possession under section 447.638, funds deposited by the owner
under this subsection shall be paid to the county collector, and funds paid into the court by a
party under subsection 1 of this section shall be paid out in full to the payer.
141.540. 1. In any county at a certain front door of whose courthouse sales of real
estate are customarily made by the sheriff under execution, the sheriff shall advertise for sale
and sell the respective parcels of real estate ordered sold by the sheriff pursuant to any
judgment of foreclosure by any court pursuant to sections 141.210 to 141.810 and 141.980 to
141.1015 at any of such courthouses[, but ]. The sale of such parcels of real estate shall be
held at the same front door as sales of real estate are customarily made by the sheriff under
execution.
2. Such advertisements may include more than one parcel of real estate, and shall be
in substantially the following form:
NOTICE OF SHERIFF'S
SALE UNDER JUDGMENT OF

HB 2898 30
FORECLOSURE OF LIENS FOR
DELINQUENT LAND TAXES
No. ______
In the Circuit Court of ______ County, Missouri.
In the Matter of Foreclosure of Liens for Delinquent Land Taxes
Collector of Revenue of ______ County, Missouri, Plaintiff,
vs.
Parcels of Land encumbered with Delinquent Tax Liens,
Defendants.
WHEREAS, judgment has been rendered against parcels of real
estate for taxes, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs with
the serial numbers of each parcel of real estate, the description
thereof, the name of the person appearing in the petition in the
suit, and the total amount of the judgment against each such
parcel for taxes, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs, all
as set out in said judgment and described in each case,
respectively, as follows: (Here set out the respective serial
numbers, descriptions, names and total amounts of each
judgment, next above referred to.) and,
WHEREAS, such judgment orders such real estate sold by the
undersigned sheriff, to satisfy the total amount of such judgment,
including interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs,
NOW, THEREFORE,
Public Notice is hereby given that I ______, Sheriff of ______
County, Missouri, will sell such real estate, parcel by parcel, at
public auction, to the highest bidder, for cash, between the hours
of nine o'clock A.M. and five o'clock P.M., at the ______ front
door of the ______ County Courthouse in ______, Missouri, on
______, the ______ day of ______, 20______, and continuing
from day to day thereafter, to satisfy the judgment as to each
respective parcel of real estate sold. If no acceptable bids are
received as to any parcel of real estate, said parcel shall be sold
to the Land Trust of ______ (insert name of County), Missouri or
Land Bank of the City of ______ (insert name of municipality),
Missouri.
Any bid received shall be subject to confirmation by the court.

HB 2898 31
__________________
Sheriff of _____ County,
Missouri
__________________
Delinquent Land Tax Attorney
Address: ______
First Publication ______, 20______
3. Such advertisement shall be published four times, once a week, upon the same day
of each week during successive weeks prior to the date of such sale, in a daily newspaper of
general circulation regularly published in the county, qualified according to law for the
publication of public notices and advertisements.
141.550. 1. The sale shall be conducted, the sheriff's return thereof made, and the
sheriff's deed pursuant to the sale executed, all as provided in the case of sales of real estate
taken under execution, except as otherwise provided in sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
sections 141.980 to 141.1015, and provided that such sale need not occur during the term of
court or while the court is in session.
2. The following provisions shall apply to any sale pursuant to this section:
(1) The sale shall be held on the day for which it is advertised, between the hours of
nine o'clock a.m. and five o'clock p.m. and continued day to day thereafter to satisfy the
judgment as to each respective parcel of real estate sold. For partial opt-in counties, the sale
shall be held on the fourth Monday in August of each year between the hours of nine o'clock
a.m. and five o'clock p.m. and continued day to day thereafter to satisfy the judgment as to
each respective parcel of real estate sold;
(2) The sale shall be conducted publicly, by auction, for ready money. The parcel
shall be sold to the highest bidder, provided that the highest bid is equal to or greater than the
full amount of all tax bills due and owing on the parcel, which may differ from the judgment
amount; plus interest; penalties; attorney's fees and costs; and a nonreimbursable, two-
hundred-dollar bidder fee. Such bidder fee shall be paid to the land trust or land bank agency
for the municipality or county in which the parcel is situated. The bid amount shall not
include any amounts for debts owed to any sewer district then due thereon;
(3) No person shall be eligible to bid at the time of the sale unless such person has, no
later than ten days before the sale date, demonstrated to the satisfaction of the official charged
by law with conducting the sale that he or she is not the owner of any parcel of real estate in
the county which is affected by a tax bill which has been delinquent for more than six months.
A prospective bidder may make such a demonstration by presenting statements from the
appropriate collection officials of the county. The official charged with conducting the sale

HB 2898 32
may require prospective bidders to submit an affidavit attesting to the requirements of this
subdivision and is expressly authorized to permanently preclude any prospective bidder from
participating in the sale for failure to comply with the provisions of this subdivision; and
(4) No foreign or domestic corporation or limited liability company that has failed to
appoint or maintain a registered agent under chapter 347 or 351 shall be eligible to bid at the
time of the sale. No foreign corporate entity shall be eligible to bid at the time of the sale
unless it has a certificate of authority to transact business in Missouri under section 351.572.
The official charged with conducting the sale may require prospective bidders to submit an
affidavit attesting to the requirements of this subdivision and is expressly authorized to
permanently preclude any prospective bidder from participating in the sale for failure to
comply with the provisions of this subdivision.
3. The following provisions shall apply to any sale under this section of property
located within any municipality contained wholly or partially within a county with a
population of over six hundred thousand inhabitants and fewer than nine hundred thousand
inhabitants:
(1) No person shall be eligible to bid at the time of the sale unless such person has, no
later than ten days before the sale date, demonstrated to the satisfaction of the official charged
by law with conducting the sale that the person is not the owner of any parcel of real property
with two or more violations of the municipality's building or housing codes. A prospective
bidder may make such a demonstration by presenting statements from the appropriate code
enforcement officials of the municipality; and
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, any taxing
authority or land bank agency shall be eligible to bid at the sale without making the
demonstration described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
4. Such sale shall convey the whole interest of every person having or claiming any
right, title or interest in or lien upon such real estate, whether such person has answered or
not, subject to rights-of-way thereon of public utilities upon which tax has been otherwise
paid, and subject to the lien thereon, if any, of the United States of America.
5. The collector shall advance the sums necessary to pay for the publication of all
advertisements required by sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015
and shall be allowed credit therefor in the collector's accounts with the county. The collector
shall give credit in such accounts for all such advances recovered by the collector. Such
expenses of publication shall be apportioned pro rata among and taxed as costs against the
respective parcels of real estate described in the judgment; provided, however, that none of
the costs herein enumerated, including the costs of publication, shall constitute any lien upon
the real estate after such sale.

HB 2898 33
141.560. 1. If, when the sheriff offers the respective parcels of real estate for sale,
there [be] areno bidders for any parcel, or there [be] isinsufficient time or opportunity to sell
all of the parcels of real estate so advertised, the sheriff shall adjourn such sale from day to
day at the same place and commencing at the same hour as when first offered and shall
announce that such real estate will be offered or reoffered for sale at such time and place.
2. With respect to any parcel of real estate not located wholly within a county or
municipality that has established a land bank agency under section 140.981 or 141.980, in the
event no bid equal to the full amount of all tax bills due and owing on the parcel, which may
differ from the judgment amount; plus interest; penalties; attorney's fees and costs; and a
nonreimbursable, two-hundred-dollar bidder fee that shall be received at such sale after any
parcel of real estate has been offered for sale on three different days, which need not be
successive, the land trust shall be deemed to have bid the full amount of all tax bills included
in the judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs then due, and if no other bid be
then received by the sheriff in excess of the bid of the land trust, and the sheriff shall so
announce at the sale, then the bid of the land trust shall be announced as accepted. The sheriff
shall report any such bid or bids so made by the land trust in the same way as the sheriff's
report of other bids is made. Upon confirmation by the court of such bid at such sale by such
land trust, the collector shall mark the tax bills so bid by the land trust as "cancelled by sale to
the land trust" and shall take credit for the full amount of such tax bills, including principal
amount, interest, penalties, attorney's fees, and costs, on the collector's books and in the
collector's statements with any other taxing authorities.
3. With respect to any parcel of real estate located wholly within a county or
municipality that has established a land bank agency under section 140.981 or 141.980, in the
event no bid equal to the full amount of all tax bills due and owing on the parcel, which may
differ from the judgment amount; plus interest; penalties; attorney's fees and costs; and a
nonreimbursable, two-hundred-dollar bidder fee that shall be received at such sale after such
parcel of real estate has been offered for sale on three different days, which need not be
successive, the land bank agency established under section 140.981 or 141.980 shall be
deemed to have bid the full amount of all tax bills included in the judgment, interest,
penalties, attorney's fees and costs then due, and the sheriff shall so announce at the sale, then
the bid of the land bank agency shall be announced as accepted. The sheriff shall report any
such bid or bids so made by such land bank agency in the same way as the sheriff's report of
other bids is made. Upon confirmation by the court of such bid at such sale by such land bank
agency, the collector shall mark the tax bills so bid by such land bank agency as "cancelled by
sale to the land bank" and shall take credit for the full amount of such tax bills, including
principal amount, interest, penalties, attorney's fees, and costs, on the collector's books and in
the collector's statements with any other taxing authorities.

HB 2898 34
141.570. The title to any real estate which shall vest in any purchaser[,] upon
confirmation of such sale by the court, or in any land bank agency or land trust, shall be an
absolute estate in fee simple, subject to rights-of-way thereon of public utilities on which tax
has been otherwise paid, and subject to any lien thereon of the United States of America, if
any, and all persons and interested parties, including the state of Missouri, any taxing
authority or tax district, as defined herein, judgment creditors, lienholders, infants,
incapacitated and disabled persons as defined in chapter 475, and nonresidents who may
have had any right, title, interest, claim, or equity of redemption in or to, or lien upon, such
lands, shall be barred and forever foreclosed of all such right, title, interest, claim, lien or
equity of redemption, and the court shall order immediate possession of such real estate be
given to such purchaser; provided, however, that such title shall also be subject to the liens of
any tax bills which may have attached after the sheriff's sale, but if such parcel of real estate is
deemed sold to the land trust pursuant to subsection 2 of section 141.560, or deemed sold to a
land bank agency pursuant to subsection 3 of section 141.560, or sold to a land bank agency
pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 141.550, the title thereto shall be free of
any such liens to the extent of the interest of any taxing authority in such real estate; provided
further, that the lien of special tax bills shall attach to the proceeds of the sheriff's sale, if any,
or shall otherwise be forever barred and foreclosed.
141.580. 1. Within six months after the sheriff sells any parcel of real estate, the
court shall, upon its own motion or upon motion of any interested party, set the cause [down]
for hearing to confirm or set aside the foreclosure sale thereof, even though such parcels are
not all of the parcels of real estate described in the notice of sheriff's foreclosure sale. Notice
of the hearing, or of the court moving to confirm the foreclosure sale, shall be sent by any
interested party to each person who was sent notice of the sale and to any interested parties as
required by prevailing notions of due process. At the time of such hearing, the sheriff shall
make report of the sale, and the court shall hear evidence of the value of the property offered
on behalf of any interested party to the suit, and shall forthwith determine whether an
adequate consideration has been paid for each such parcel. The court's judgment shall include
a specific finding that adequate notice was provided to all interested parties under prevailing
notions of due process and sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015,
reciting the notice efforts of the collector, sheriff, and tax sale purchaser. Nothing in this
section shall be interpreted to preclude a successful tax sale purchaser from asserting a claim
to quiet title to the bid-upon parcel under section 527.150.
2. For this purpose the court shall have power to summon any city or county official
or any private person to testify as to the reasonable value of the property, and if the court finds
that adequate consideration has been paid, the court shall confirm the sale and order the
sheriff to issue a deed to the purchaser. If the court finds that the consideration paid is

HB 2898 35
inadequate, the court shall confirm the sale if the purchaser increases the purchaser's bid to
such amount as the court deems to be adequate and makes such additional payment, or if all
tax bills included in the judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs then due
thereon are not paid in full by one or more interested parties to the suit. If the court finds that
the consideration is inadequate, but the purchaser declines to increase the purchaser's bid to
such amount as the court deems adequate and make such additional payment, then the sale
shall be disapproved if all tax bills included in the judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees
and costs then due thereon are paid in full by one or more interested parties to the suit, the lien
of the judgment continued, and such parcel of real estate shall be again advertised and offered
for sale by the sheriff to the highest bidder at public auction for cash at any subsequent
sheriff's foreclosure sale. Unless the court requires evidence of the value of the property
conveyed to land trust or a land bank agency, none shall be required, and the amount bid by
the land trust or such land bank agency shall be deemed adequate consideration.
3. If the sale is confirmed, the court shall order the proceeds [of] from the sale
applied in the following order:
(1) To the payment of the costs of the publication of the notice of foreclosure and of
the sheriff's foreclosure sale;
(2) To the payment of all of the collector's and sheriff's costs including appraiser's fee
and attorney's fees;
(3) To the payment of all tax bills adjudged to be due in the order of their priority,
including principal, interest and penalties thereon, except in the event of a sale to any land
bank agency, for which this subdivision shall not apply.

If, after such payment, there is any sum remaining of the proceeds of the sheriff's foreclosure
sale, the court shall thereupon try and determine the other issues in the suit in accordance with
section 141.480. If any answering parties have specially appealed as provided in section
141.570, the court shall retain the custody of such funds pending disposition of such appeal,
and upon disposition of such appeal shall make such distribution. If there are not sufficient
proceeds of the sale to pay all claims in any class described, the court shall order the same to
be paid pro rata in accordance with the priorities.
4. If there are any funds remaining of the proceeds after the sheriff's sale and after the
distribution of such funds as herein set out and no person entitled to any such funds, whether
or not a party to the suit, shall, within two years after such sale, appear and claim the funds,
the funds shall be distributed to the appropriate taxing authorities, except in partial opt-in
counties, where the funds shall be distributed to the school fund for the county.
5. Any county operating under the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 and
sections 141.980 to 141.1015 may elect to allocate a portion of its share of the proceeds

HB 2898 36
toward a fund for the purpose of defending against claims challenging the sufficiency of
notice provisions under this section.
6. Any interested party, other than the sheriff's sale purchaser, who moves the court to
set aside a sheriff's sale after the issuance of a sheriff's deed made under the provisions of
sections 141.210 to 141.810 and sections 141.980 to 141.1015 shall be required to pay into
the court the redemption amount otherwise necessary under sections 141.420 and 141.530
prior to the court hearing any such motion to set aside.
141.610. Each court administrator's or sheriff's deed given pursuant to the provisions
of the land tax collection law shall be prima facie evidence that the suit and all proceedings
therein and all proceedings prior thereto[ from and], including assessment of the lands
affected thereby and all notices required by law were regular and in accordance with all
provisions of the law relating thereto. The court administrator or sheriff shall record its deed
and shall collect said recording fee at the time of sale.
141.620. 1. In addition to all amounts due on any tax bill, including principal,
interest, penalties, attorney's fees, and costs, as now fixed by law, there shall be imposed and
charged as a part of the costs on each such tax bill a suit penalty of five percent of the
principal amount of the tax bill to be due to the collector upon the filing of the petition with
the circuit clerk.
2. The collector shall set up a separate fund in the collector's accounts to which the
collector shall credit such five percent suit penalties when paid, together with all other
penalties and costs recovered under this action, and shall retain such portion thereof as may
be needed for the purpose of paying the expenses and costs required to be advanced under
sections 141.210 to 141.810, including compensation to the delinquent land tax attorney, the
attorney's assistants, and stenographic and clerical help, and funds for the costs of publication,
notices, for court costs, sheriff's expenses and other costs hereunder, and shall transfer the
remainder of such funds annually, on January first of each year, to the land trust for the use
and expenses of the land trust. Where no land trust exists, the collector shall retain the
remainder of such funds.
141.680. 1. Except for partial opt-in counties, the remedies and procedures set forth
in sections 141.210 to 141.810 shall be the exclusive remedies and procedures available for
the collection of delinquent and back land taxes in a county [electing] that elect to come
under or [which] that has come under their authority. Sections 141.210 to 141.810 shall not
be affected nor infringed upon by any other laws or parts of law in conflict herewith.
2. Any taxing authority or owner of any tax bill is hereby prohibited from advertising
for sale or selling any parcel of real estate for the collection of delinquent land taxes due
thereon, except after judgment of a court having jurisdiction ordering such advertising or sale,

HB 2898 37
when such parcel is at such time included in any petition filed pursuant to the provisions of
this law.
3. At the option of the taxing authority or tax bill owner, all claims for land taxes
against any parcel of real estate, which has been included in any petition filed under this law,
where such taxes have become due and payable after any tax list or petition thereon has been
filed, may be asserted by amended petition or by answer filed before judgment, and, if
allowed by the court, shall be included in the judgment against such parcel of real estate.
141.700. In all counties electing to operate under sections 141.210 to 141.810 prior to
January 1, 2025, there is hereby created a commission for the management, sale, and other
disposition of tax delinquent lands, which commission shall be known as "The Land Trust of
______ County, Missouri", and the members thereof shall be known as land trustees. Such
land trust shall have and exercise all the powers that are conferred by sections 141.210 to
141.810 necessary and incidental to the effective management, sale or other disposition of
real estate acquired under and by virtue of the foreclosure of the lien for delinquent real estate
taxes, as provided in said sections, and in the exercise of such powers, the land trust shall be
deemed to be a public corporation acting in a governmental capacity. Where a county has
elected to establish a land bank agency under subsection 1 of section 140.981, no such land
trust shall be created under sections 141.700 to 141.810.
141.819. 1. In all partial opt-in counties, prior to a confirmation by a court of a
deemed bid under subsection 2 of section 141.560, a land trust shall be created for the
management, sale, and other disposition of tax delinquent lands, which shall be known as
"The Land Trust of ______ County, Missouri", and the board of which shall be known as land
trustees. The county commission of such county shall appoint by resolution or order one or
three land trustees. The first appointed land trustee shall serve for a term of two years and the
remaining land trustees shall serve for terms of three years respectively, as applicable.
Thereafter, land trustees shall be appointed by the county commission for a term of office of
two years, except that all vacancies shall be filled for an unexpired term.
2. If a county elected to establish a land bank agency under subsection 1 of section
140.981, no such land trust shall be created under sections 141.700 to 141.819.
3. Such land trust, by majority vote of the land trustees, shall have the power and duty
to sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of real estate, provided, however, that any such sale,
exchange, or disposal shall be for consideration equal to or in excess of two-thirds of the
appraised value of such real estate so sold or conveyed, and if such consideration is less than
two-thirds of the appraised value of such real estate, the land trust shall first procure a
majority vote of the county commission.
4. (1) The land trust shall set up accounts relating to the operation and management
of the land trust.

HB 2898 38
(2) When any parcel of real estate is sold or otherwise disposed of by the land trust,
the proceeds therefrom shall be applied and distributed in the following order:
(a) To the payment of the expenses of sale;
(b) To the costs of the care, improvement, operation, acquisition, demolition,
management, and administration of parcels of real estate owned by the land trust; and
(c) To the county's general fund.
5. No land trustee shall receive any compensation, emolument, or other profit directly
or indirectly from the rental, management, acquisition, sale, demolition, repair, rehabilitation,
use, operation, ownership, or disposition of any lands held by such land trust.
141.980. 1. (1) Sections 141.980 to 141.1015 shall be known [and may be cited] as
the "Chapter 141 Municipal Land Bank Act".
(2) Any municipality located wholly or partially within a county electing to operate
wholly under the provisions of sections 141.210 to 141.810 may establish a land bank agency
for the management, sale, transfer, and other disposition of interests in real estate owned by
such land bank agency. Any such land bank agency created shall be created to foster the
public purpose of returning land, including land that is in a nonrevenue-generating, nontax-
producing status to use in private ownership or for public use. Such land bank agency shall
be established by ordinance or resolution as applicable. Such land bank agency shall not own
any interest in real estate that is located wholly or partially outside such establishing
municipality. No municipality in a partial opt-in county is eligible to establish a land bank
agency under this section.
2. The beneficiaries of the land bank agency shall be the taxing authorities that held
or owned tax bills against the respective parcels of real estate acquired by such land bank
agency pursuant to a deemed sale under subsection 3 of section 141.560, by deed from a land
trust under subsection 1 of section 141.984, or pursuant to a sale under subdivision (2) of
subsection 2 of section 141.550 included in the judgment of the court, and the beneficiaries'
respective interests in each parcel of real estate shall be to the extent and in the proportion and
according to the priorities determined by the court on the basis that the principal amount of
the beneficiaries' respective tax bills bore to the total principal amount of all of the tax bills
described in the judgment.
3. Each land bank agency created pursuant to this chapter shall be a public body
corporate and politic, and shall have permanent and perpetual duration until terminated and
dissolved in accordance with the provisions of section 141.1012.
141.984. 1. Within one year of the effective date of the ordinance or resolution
passed establishing a land bank agency under this chapter, title to any real property held by a
land trust created pursuant to section 141.700 that is located wholly within the municipality
that created the land bank agency shall be transferred by deed to such land bank agency.

HB 2898 39
2. The income of a land bank agency shall be exempt from all taxation by the state
and by any of its political subdivisions. Upon acquiring title to any real estate, a land bank
agency shall immediately notify the county assessor and the collector of such ownership, and
such real estate shall be exempt from all taxation during the land bank agency's ownership
thereof, in the same manner and to the same extent as any other publicly owned real estate,
and upon the sale or other disposition of any real estate held by it, such land bank agency shall
immediately notify the county assessor and the collector of such change of ownership;
provided however, that such tax exemption for improved and occupied real property held by
such land bank agency as lessor pursuant to a ground lease shall terminate upon the first such
occupancy, and such land bank agency shall immediately notify the county assessor and the
collector of such occupancy.
3. Subject to the limitation set forth in subsection 1 of section 141.980, a land bank
agency may acquire real property or interests in property by gift, devise, transfer, exchange,
foreclosure, purchase, or [pursuant to sections 141.560 to 141.580 or section 141.819. A land
bank agency may only purchase real property for the purpose of adding to a parcel already
owned by the land bank agency] or otherwise on terms and conditions and in a manner
the land bank agency considers proper.
4. Subject to the limitation set forth in subsection 1 of section 141.980, a land bank
agency may acquire property by purchase contracts, installment sales contracts, and land
contacts, and may accept transfers from political subdivisions upon such terms and conditions
as agreed to by the land bank agency and the political subdivision. Subject to the limitation
set forth in subsection 1 of section 141.980, a land bank agency may bid on any parcel of real
estate offered for sale at a sheriff's foreclosure sale held in accordance with section 141.550.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, but subject to the limitation set forth in
subsection 1 of section 141.980, any political subdivision may transfer to the land bank
agency real property and interests in real property of the political subdivision on such terms
and conditions and according to such procedures as determined by the political subdivision.
5. A land bank agency shall maintain all of its real property in accordance with the
laws and ordinances of the jurisdictions in which the real property is located.
6. Upon confirmation under section 141.580 of a sheriff's foreclosure sale of a parcel
of real estate to a land bank agency under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 141.550,
said land bank agency shall pay the amount of the land bank agency's bid that exceeds the
amount of all tax bills included in the judgment, interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs
then due thereon. Such excess shall be applied and distributed in accordance with subsections
3 and 4 of section 141.580, exclusive of subdivision (3) of subsection 3 thereof. Upon such
confirmation by the court, the collector shall mark the tax bills included in the judgment as
"cancelled by sale to the land bank" and shall take credit for the full amount of such tax bills,

HB 2898 40
including principal amount, interest, penalties, attorney's fees, and costs, on the collector's
books and in the collector's statements with any other taxing authorities.
141.1009. 1. A land bank agency shall be authorized to file an action to quiet title
pursuant to section 527.150 as to any real property in which the land bank agency has an
interest. For purposes of any and all such actions,the land bank agency shall be deemed to be
the holder of sufficient legal and equitable interests, and possessory rights, so as to qualify the
land bank agency as adequate petitioner in such action.
2. Prior to the filing of an action to quiet title the land bank agency shall conduct an
examination of title to determine the identity of any and all persons and entities possessing a
claim or interest in or to the real property. Service of the petition to quiet title shall be
provided to all such interested parties by the following methods:
(1) Registered or certified mail to such identity and address as reasonably
ascertainable by an inspection of public records;
(2) In the case of occupied real property by first class mail, addressed to "Occupant";
(3) By posting a copy of the notice on the real property;
(4) By publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality in which
the property is located; and
(5) Such other methods as the court may order or as may be required by prevailing
notions of due process.
3. As part of the petition to quiet title the land bank agency shall file an affidavit
identifying all parties potentially having an interest in the real property, and the form of notice
provided.
4. The court shall schedule a hearing on the petition within ninety days following
filing of the petition, and as to all matters upon which an answer was not filed by an interested
party the court shall issue its final judgment within one hundred twenty days of the filing of
the petition.
5. A land bank agency shall be authorized to join in a single petition to quiet title one
or more parcels of real property.
141.1020. Notwithstanding any provision of sections 141.980 to 141.1020 to the
contrary, a land bank agency may rent or lease property held by the land bank agency for
community, noncommercial, and agricultural uses.
249.255. 1. Should a public sewer district created and organized pursuant to
constitutional or statutory authority place a lien upon a customer's property for unpaid sewer
charges, the lien, once properly recorded, shall have priority above all liens except for those
taxes levied for state and county purposes.
2. Should the sewer charges of a public sewer district created and organized pursuant
to constitutional or statutory authority remain unpaid for a period in excess of three months,

HB 2898 41
the district, after notice to the customer by certified mail, shall have the authority at its
discretion, to disconnect the customer's sewer line from the district's line or request any
private water company, public water supply district, or any municipality supplying water to
the premises to discontinue service to the customer until such time as the sewer charges and
all related costs of this section are paid.
✔